Ohio, session 136, HB691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2921.50 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2921.50. (A) As used in this section, "federal law enforcement officer" means an employee of the United States who serves in a position the duties of which are primarily the investigation, apprehension, or detention of individuals suspected or convicted of offenses under the criminal laws of the United States or found to have committed offenses under the civil laws of the United States. (B) No law enforcement officer or federal law enforcement officer shall purposefully wear any mask or personal disguise while interacting with the public in the performance of the officer's duties, except for the following: (1) Medical grade masks that are surgical or N95 or KN95 respirators designed to prevent the transmission of airborne diseases and worn for that purpose; (2) Masks designed to protect against exposure to smoke or other environmental dangers and worn for that purpose; (3) Masks or other protective equipment used by special weapons and tactics team officers in the performance of those officers' duties and worn for that purpose. (C) Law enforcement officers and federal law enforcement officers shall display the officer's name and badge number as part of the officer's uniform. (D) Whoever violates division (B) or (C) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (E) This section does not apply to a law enforcement officer while the officer is engaged in an undercover assignment. (F) If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision of this section to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this section or related sections that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. To this end, the provisions are severable. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Community and Police Protection Act.